Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Chapter 2 Corporate Powers and Duties

Cross references. —

As to powers of county officers generally, see chapter 3 of this title.

As to authority of state, counties and municipal corporations to acquire by condemnation proceedings, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

.

As to actions by or against state agency or political subdivision, see §§

1-35-101

through

1-35-108

.

As to county tax levies and limitation on amount, see §

21-13-102

.

As to general county school tax, see §

21-13-201

.

As to establishment, vacation or alteration of county highways, see §§

24-3-101

to

24-3-127

.

As to powers and limitations upon local authorities with reference to regulation of motor vehicles, see title 31.

Law reviews. —

See article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 193 to 230.

Power of governing body of county to dispose of county real estate in absence of specific statutory authority, 21 ALR2d 722.

Operation of garage for maintenance and repair of municipal vehicles as governmental function, 26 ALR2d 944.

Power of county to sell, lease or mortgage public utility plant or interest therein, 61 ALR2d 595.

Recovery of exemplary or punitive damages from municipal corporation, 1 ALR4th 448.

20 C.J.S. Counties §§ 45 to 62.

§ 18-2-101.
General powers.

Each organized county in the state is a body corporate and politic. The powers of the county shall be exercised by a board of county commissioners which may:

Sue and be sued;

Purchase property for the use of the county and acquire real property at tax sales, as provided by law;

Sell or convey property owned by the county, when it is in the best interests of the county;

Make contracts and perform other acts relating to the property and concerns of the county in the exercise of its corporate or administrative powers;

Exercise other powers as provided by law;

Establish a surface water drainage system, utilities and drainage management; and

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 22, § 2.

Declare and abate nuisances which the commission determines to be a threat to health or safety as provided in W.S.

18-2-115

. No person shall create, continue or permit nuisances to exist in violation of a final order issued pursuant to W.S.

18-2-115

. Any resolution passed by a board of county commissioners pursuant to this paragraph is enforceable, in addition to other remedies provided by law, by injunction, mandamus or abatement. Whoever fails to comply with a final order shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to one hundred dollars ($100.00) per day for each day the violation continues. No resolution issued pursuant to this paragraph shall regulate any permitted industrial facility or oil and gas or mining operations necessary to the extraction, production or exploration of the mineral resources. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to impair or modify any rights afforded to farm or ranch operations pursuant to the Wyoming Right to Farm and Ranch Act.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1791; R.S. 1899, § 1073; C.S. 1910, § 1067; C.S. 1920, § 1300; R.S. 1931, § 29-301; C.S. 1945, § 26-301; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-48, 18-50; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1995, ch. 118, § 2; 1998, ch. 84, § 1; 1999, ch. 22, § 2; 2008, ch. 81, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to county cooperation in extension work in agriculture and home economics, see §

21-17-305

.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted (a)(viii) and made a related stylistic change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

In general. —

County has authority to make contracts, and do all other acts in relation to the property and concerns of the county necessary to the exercise of its corporate or administrative powers. Appel v. State, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1900).

Governmental functions defined. —

Governmental functions are those conferred or imposed on the county as a local agency of limited and prescribed jurisdiction, to be employed in administering the affairs of the state, and promoting the public welfare generally. Bondurant v. Board of Trustees, 354 P.2d 219,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1960), citing War Memorial Hosp. of Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 371, 279 P.2d 472,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1955).

The provisions of this section would seem to apply to property acquired by tax sale. Probasco v. Sikes, 77 Wyo. 108, 307 P.2d 817,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1957).

Conveyance of land. —

It is for the board of commissioners in the exercise of its discretion, in good faith, to determine whether it shall convey for a site for a federal building, as unnecessary for the purposes of the county, part of a tract of land owned by the county, on another part of which the county buildings are located. Collins v. Board of Comm'rs, 20 Wyo. 517, 126 P. 465,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1912).

Implied contract, nonapplicability. —

County is not liable on theory of implied contract for benefits received, to contractor who constructed road upon oral authorization from individual members of board of county commissioners when same was not a county road. George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1940).

County road, implied establishment. —

County road cannot be established by implication through construction thereof under invalid agreement with members of board of county commissioners, individually, when road was not of statutory width and on completion was not taken over by commissioners. George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1940).

Private roads. —

The board of county commissioners has no authority to take charge and control of a private road on behalf of the county since its powers are limited to duly established county roads. George W. Condon Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 56 Wyo. 38, 103 P.2d 401,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1940).

Notices of tax sales. —

Treasurer may publish notice of sale of real property for delinquent taxes in any newspaper he may select and the county is liable for the expense thereof. Albany County v. Chaplin, 5 Wyo. 74, 37 P. 370,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1894).

Applied

in

Haddenham v. Board of County Comm'rs, 679 P.2d 429,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(1984); Martens v. Johnson County Bd. of Comm'rs, 954 P.2d 375,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1998).

Cited

in

Collins v. Board of County Comm'rs, 20 Wyo. 517, 126 P. 465,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(1912); Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Geringer, 297 F.3d 1108,

2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 15353

(10th Cir. 2002); Western Wyo. Constr. Co. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs of Sublette, 2015 WY 77,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(May 27, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

§ 18-2-102.
Property.

Any property conveyed to a county, is the property of the county.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1792; R.S. 1899, § 1074; C.S. 1910, § 1069; C.S. 1920, § 1302; R.S. 1931, § 29-303; C.S. 1945, § 26-302; W.S. 1957, § 18-49; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Disallowance of claims. —

Where county commissioners contracted with attorneys to defend county in court actions and issued certificates of indebtedness, which were registered and assigned by payees for value, but later passed resolution that attorneys had not rendered service, cancelled certificates and ordered treasurer not to pay them, allowance of claim and issuance of certificates did not preclude county contesting claim, as certificates are merely orders on the treasurer to pay when funds available, and may be revoked and payment stopped if later a defense develops which justifies recision of contract, whereupon treasurer in mandamus action may plead the resolution and order of commissioners as his defense. State ex rel. Robertson Inv. Co. v. Patterson, 47 Wyo. 416, 38 P.2d 617,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1934).

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Chaplin, 5 Wyo. 74, 37 P. 370,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1894); Collins v. Board of County Comm'rs, 20 Wyo. 517, 126 P. 465,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(1912).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of governing body of county to dispose of county real estate in absence of specific statutory authority, 21 ALR2d 722.

Power of county as to lease or sublease of property owned or leased by it, 47 ALR3d 19.

§ 18-2-103.
Buildings generally; infrastructure for court information technology.

Each county shall provide and maintain a suitable courthouse, jail and other necessary county buildings.

Each county shall provide and maintain infrastructure to ensure the proper function of court information technology equipment including, but not limited to, requisite power outlets, network drops, audio and visual drops and associated wiring for connectivity of all endpoints and peripherals associated with court information technology equipment.

For purposes of this section, “court information technology equipment” means as defined in W.S. 5-2-120(d)(i).

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 4; R.S. 1887, §§ 1366, 1794; R.S. 1899, § 1025; C.S. 1910, § 1078; C.S. 1920, § 1311; R.S. 1931, § 29-401; C.S. 1945, § 26-304; W.S. 1957, § 18-51; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2018 ch. 18, § 1, effective March 9, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

added (b) and (c).

Laws 2018, ch. 18, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to county courthouses and jails generally, see chapter 6 of this title.

As to duty of sheriff as custodian of jail, see §

18-3-603

.

As to county libraries generally, see ch. 7 of this title.

As to memorial hospitals, see ch. 8 of this title.

As to fairgrounds, airports, parks, pleasure grounds and recreational systems, see ch. 9 of this title.

§ 18-2-104.
Joint city and county buildings.

Any county and its county seat, acting through the board of county commissioners and the city or town council respectively may agree for the joint purchase or construction and use of:

A building to be used as a county courthouse and city hall, to be known as a city and county building;

A public auditorium, athletic fields, civic center or other community buildings, which may be designated as a memorial to the veterans of the United States of America as the board and council may determine.

The county and its county seat shall each contribute to the cost of purchase or construction of any facility specified in subsection (a) of this section in such amounts as they agree.

The county commissioners and the city or town council shall fix all details and control of construction, maintenance and management and the division of the expense of maintenance and management of facilities specified in subsection (a) of this section by agreement, and the agreement shall bind both parties until modified or rescinded by mutual agreement.

All laws relative to raising funds and issuing bonds by counties, cities or towns for purchasing or constructing county courthouses and jails and city and town halls, respectively, are applicable for the facilities specified in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 24, §§ 1 to 3; C.S. 1920, § 1332; R.S. 1931, § 29-420; C.S. 1945, § 26-419; Laws 1947, ch. 135, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-52; Laws 1963, ch. 148, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of governmental borrowing or expenditure for purposes of acquiring, maintaining or improving stadium for use of professional athletic team, 67 ALR3d 1186.

§ 18-2-105.
County, city or local housing authority; authority to establish senior citizen center; receiving state and federal monies; contracting for services.

A board of county commissioners, cities or local housing authorities designated by said counties or cities may establish and maintain senior citizen centers to provide transportation, information, recreation facilities and other services which will enable senior citizens to maintain their independence and to avoid institutionalization as long as possible. A board of county commissioners, cities or local housing authorities designated by said counties or cities may receive both state and federal monies for the establishment and maintenance of these facilities. A board of county commissioners, the mayor and council or the board of commissioners of a local housing authority may provide these services or contract with public or private organizations or individuals for the services.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 90, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Sections 18-48.3 to 18-48.5, W.S. 1957, which were enacted by § 1, ch. 90, Laws 1977, have been renumbered as §§

18-2-105

to

18-2-107

and §§

18-2-105

to

18-2-108

, which were enacted by § 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, have been redesignated as §§

18-2-108

to

18-2-111

, accordingly.

§ 18-2-106.
Senior citizen advisory commission.

A board of county commissioners, the mayor and council or the board of commissioners of a local housing authority may appoint an advisory commission for senior citizens. The composition of the advisory commission, the appointment and terms of its members and provisions for its organization and procedures shall be determined by the board of county commissioners. A member may be removed for cause by the board of county commissioners or other appointing body. The board shall fill any vacancy by appointment for the unexpired term.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 90, § 1.

§ 18-2-107.
Cooperation with other agencies for funding and operation of senior citizen centers.

The county, city or local housing authority may cooperate with other agencies as provided in W.S.

16-1-101

, for the operation and funding of senior citizen centers.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 90, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “16-1-101” for “9-18.7.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 18-2-108.
Joint establishment, operation, contracts and agreements of facilities by local governments; sharing of costs; issuance of bonds; limitation on expenditures.

Each county, municipality, school, hospital or other special district, or any two (2) or more of them may enter into contracts or agreements to jointly establish and operate recreation facilities, water, liquid or solid waste facilities, police protection agency facilities, fire protection agency facilities, transportation system facilities, public school facilities, airports, public health facilities, community college facilities, hospital and related medical facilities, courthouse, jail and administrative office facilities or any combination thereof, and public access roads to school, hospital or other special districts where not otherwise provided by law.

Each county, municipality, school, hospital or other special district, or any two (2) or more of them may enter into contracts or agreements to jointly purchase, lease, construct and operate facilities and equipment used in joint operations permitted under this section and may issue their bonds for such purpose as provided by law.

The costs of the joint operations and joint use of machinery and facilities specified in this section shall be shared among the contracting parties as determined by their governing boards but no cost shall be incurred nor monies expended by any contracting party which will be in excess of limits prescribed by law for expenditures by it.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 101, §§ 1 to 4; 1975, ch. 172, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to memorial hospitals generally, see chapter 8 of this title.

As to fairgrounds, airports, parks, pleasure grounds and recreational systems, see chapter 9 of this title.

As to solid waste disposal districts, see chapter 11 of this title.

Editor's notes. —

See Editor's note to §

18-2-105

.

§ 18-2-109.
Name in which county shall sue or be sued.

In all suits or proceedings the county shall sue or be sued as the “board of county commissioners of the county of
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
,” but this shall not prevent county officers when authorized by law from suing in their name of office for the benefit of the county.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 1795; R.S. 1899, § 1076; C.S. 1910, § 1071; C.S. 1920, § 1304; R.S. 1931, § 29-305; C.S. 1945, § 26-305; W.S. 1957, § 18-53; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to actions by or against state, state agencies and political subdivisions generally, see §§

1-35-101

through

1-35-108

.

Corporate name. —

Notwithstanding the statutory provisions that counties may sue in their corporate name, actions must be brought by and against the board of commissioners of the county. Board Comm'rs Sweetwater County v. Young, 3 Wyo. 684, 29 P. 1002,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1892).

Disallowance of claims. —

Where county commissioners contracted with attorneys to defend county in court actions, allowed claim for retainer and issued certificates of indebtedness, but later passed resolution that attorneys had not rendered service, cancelled certificates and ordered treasurer not to pay them, allowance of claim and issuance of certificates did not preclude county from contesting the claim, as certificates are merely orders on the treasurer to pay when funds available and may be revoked and payment stopped if later a defense develops which justifies recision of contract. Treasurer in a mandamus action may plead the resolution and order of commissioners as his defense. State ex rel. Robertson Inv. Co. v. Patterson, 47 Wyo. 416, 38 P.2d 617,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1934).

Variance. —

Where title of board was given incorrectly as “the board of commissioners of Natrona county,” instead of “the board of the county commissioners of the county of Natrona,” variance is too trivial to be noticed by court. Board of Comm'rs v. Casper Nat'l Bank, 56 Wyo. 132, 105 P.2d 578,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1940).

Cited

in

North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 28 Wyo. 183, 201 P. 1022,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1921).

§ 18-2-110.
Commissioners to receive service of process and employ attorney in behalf of counties.

In all legal proceedings against the county process shall be served on the board of county commissioners or any member thereof and they may in the absence of the county attorney employ an attorney to defend them, for which they may make an appropriation from the general county fund.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 1796; R.S. 1899, § 1078; C.S. 1910, § 1072; C.S. 1920, § 1305; R.S. 1931, § 29-306; C.S. 1945, § 26-306; W.S. 1957, § 18-54; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

See also §

18-3-302

as to employment of other attorneys by county. As to restrictions on employment of attorneys, see §

18-3-520

.

Change in personnel. —

Where injunction was sought against board of county commissioners and members thereof, individually and as commissioners, and judgment was for defendants, and plaintiff brought error, it was no ground for dismissal of the proceedings in error that the membership of county commissioners had changed. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 28 Wyo. 183, 201 P. 1022,

1921 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1921).

Facts govern. —

Where county commissioners had no personal interest in suits and action was not against them individually, commissioners had power as board representing county to employ private attorneys to defend actions and to pay them, assertion in pleadings that county was not sued being a mere conclusion. The facts govern. Board of Comm'rs v. Casper Nat'l Bank, 56 Wyo. 132, 105 P.2d 578,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1940).

Individual interest, effect. —

Where county commissioners were charged with fraudulently conspiring to extort money from county treasury, being individually interested in action, they were unable to exercise proper discretion in employing private attorneys and could not impose liability on county for paying them. Board of Comm'rs v. Casper Nat'l Bank, 56 Wyo. 132, 105 P.2d 578,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1940).

Private counsel. —

The board of county commissioners may engage private counsel, in absence of county attorney, or in case of his refusal to act. Board of Comm'rs v. Casper Nat'l Bank, 56 Wyo. 132, 105 P.2d 578,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1940).

Risk of accusation. —

When one accepts public office, he assumes risk of defending himself even against unfounded accusations at own expense. Board of Comm'rs v. Casper Nat'l Bank, 56 Wyo. 132, 105 P.2d 578,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1940).

Cited

in

Appel v. State ex rel. Shutter-Cottrell, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1900); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Argeris, 2014 WY 150,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Nov. 19, 2014).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Persons upon whom notice of injury or claim against county may or must be served, 23 ALR2d 969.

§ 18-2-111.
Judgment against county to be paid by tax levy; when execution to issue.

Except as provided in W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

when a judgment is rendered against the board of county commissioners or any county officer the judgment shall be paid by a tax levied for that purpose and when collected shall be paid by the county treasurer to the judgment creditor upon the delivery of a proper voucher. Execution may issue on the judgment if payment is not made within sixty (60) days after the time required for the payment of county taxes to the county treasurer.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 1798; R.S. 1899, § 1077; C.S. 1910, § 1074; C.S. 1920, § 1307; R.S. 1931, § 29-308; C.S. 1945, § 26-307; W.S. 1957, § 18-55; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1979, ch. 157, § 2; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “1-39-121” for “1-39-119.”

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo.Const. Approved March 9, 2010

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “1-39-120” for “1-39-121.”

Limitation. —

This section does not authorize the levy of a tax in excess of the rate limited by the constitution, but judgments must be paid out of the amount realized by the levy for ordinary county purposes. Grand I. & N. W. R.R. v. Baker, 6 Wyo. 369, 45 P. 494,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1896).

Stated in

Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Argeris, 2014 WY 150,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Nov. 19, 2014).

§ 18-2-112.
Contracts for human services.

A county may contract for treatment and preventive services for the mentally ill, substance abuser and developmentally disabled as provided in W.S.

35-1-611

through

35-1-627

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “35-1-627” for “35-1-626.”

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo.Const. Approved March 9, 2010

§ 18-2-113.
Prohibition of towing by a county.

As used in this section, “towing service” means the transportation or recovery of privately owned vehicles or the disposal of abandoned, privately owned vehicles by use of a motor vehicle altered, designed or equipped to tow or render assistance for vehicles by means of a crane, hoist, tow bar, tow line or dolly.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a county shall not purchase or use equipment purchased by the county to engage in a towing service.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, a county may purchase or use equipment to engage in a towing service if there is no privately owned commercial towing service operating in the county that is able and willing to perform a towing service at a reasonable cost.

Nothing in this section prohibits the use of a county vehicle which is otherwise engaged in authorized activities, from providing assistance to stranded motorists.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 51, § 1.

§ 18-2-114.
Prohibitions; amateur radio antenna regulation.

No county shall enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation that fails to conform to the limited preemption entitled “Amateur Radio Preemption, 101 FCC 2d 952 (1985)” issued by the federal communications commission. An ordinance or regulation adopted by a county with respect to amateur radio antennas shall conform to the limited federal preemption which states local regulations that involve placement, screening or height of antennas based on health, safety or aesthetic considerations shall be crafted to reasonably accommodate amateur communications. No ordinance or regulation adopted by a county under this section shall establish a maximum height for an amateur radio antenna of less than seventy (70) feet above ground.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 76, § 1; 1998, ch. 34, § 1.

§ 18-2-115.
Nuisance abatement; procedures.

A board of county commissioners shall, by resolution, establish standards for determining when a site may be declared a nuisance under W.S. 18-2-101(a)(viii).

A board of county commissioners may issue an order declaring a property to be a nuisance under W.S. 18-2-101(a)(viii) and shall provide written notice to the owner or occupant of the property describing with specificity the nature of the nuisance and the steps required for abatement. The order shall be in writing, shall state the grounds for the order and shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court of the county in which the property is situated. A copy of the order shall be served in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure upon the owner or occupant with a written notice that the order has been filed and shall remain in force, unless the owner or occupant files his objections or answer with the clerk of the district court within twenty (20) days. A copy of the order shall be posted in a conspicuous place upon the property.

Within twenty (20) days of service of an order issued under subsection (b) of this section, the owner or occupant may file with the clerk of the district court and serve upon the board of county commissioners issuing the order, an answer denying the existence of any of the allegations in the order. If no answer is filed and served, the order shall become a final order declaring the site a nuisance and fix a time when the order shall be enforced. If an answer is filed and served, the court shall hear and determine the issues raised as set forth in subsection (d) of this section.

The court shall hold a hearing within twenty (20) days from the date of the filing of the answer. If the court sustains all or any part of the order, the court shall issue a final order and fix a time within which all or any part of the final order shall be enforced.

An appeal from the judgment or final order of the district court may be taken by any party to the proceeding in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 81, § 1.

Effective date.—

Laws 2008, ch. 81, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 18-2-116.
County prohibitions on utility connections.

No county shall enact or implement any resolution or policy that prohibits, or has the effect of prohibiting, the connection or reconnection of an electric, natural gas, propane or other energy utility service provided by a public utility, municipality or cooperative utility.

History.

2021 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 153, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.